Utah statutes.
31A-26-211.   Claims liaison.

Authorized insurers with employees engaged in insurance adjusting may be required by the commissioner to designate one or more natural persons to whom the commissioner or his staff may direct inquiries concerning the insurer's claims adjustments. Insurers shall report to the commissioner the name, title, business address, telephone number of, and any changes in its designees under this section.

